Maine, session 132, LD1276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1611, sub-§2, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. For intrastate commercial motor vehicles, there is a combined single limit of
$750,000.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to all commercial motor vehicle liability
insurance policies executed, delivered, issued for delivery, continued or renewed in this
State on or after January 1, 2026. For purposes of this Act, all policies are deemed to be
renewed no later than the next yearly anniversary of the contract date.
Page 1 - 132LR2151(03)